New Jersey, session 222, A2416.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 6 of P.L.1981, c.295 (C.26:2D-29) is amended to read as follows: 6.    6. a. The board shall admit to examination for licensing any applicant who shall pay to the department a nonrefundable fee established by rule of the commission and submit satisfactory evidence, verified by oath or affirmation, that the applicant: (1)   At the time of application is at least [18] 16 years of age; (2)   Is of good moral character; and (3)   Has: (a) successfully completed a four-year course of study in a secondary school approved by the State Board of Education[, or]; (b)   passed an approved equivalency test; or (c)   enrolled in a four-year course of study in a secondary school approved by the State Board of Education or in an alternative education program, of which either will lead to a high school diploma or equivalent. b.    In addition to the requirements of subsection a. [hereof] of this section, any person seeking to obtain a license in a specific area of radiologic technology shall comply with the following requirements: (1)   Each applicant for a license as a diagnostic x-ray technologist (LRT (R)) shall have satisfactorily completed a 24-month course of study in radiologic technology approved by the board or its equivalent, as determined by the board. (2)   Each applicant for a license as a radiation therapy technologist (LRT(T)) shall have satisfactorily completed a 24-month course in radiation therapy technology approved by the board or the equivalent of such, as determined by the board. (3)   Each applicant for a license as a chest x-ray technologist (LRT(C)) shall have satisfactorily completed the basic curriculum for chest radiography as approved by the board or its equivalent, as determined by the board. (4)   Each applicant for a license as a dental x-ray technologist (LRT(D)) shall have satisfactorily completed the curriculum for dental radiography as approved by the board or its equivalent, as determined by the board. (5)   Each applicant for a license as a podiatric x-ray technologist (LRT(P)) shall have satisfactorily completed the basic curriculum for podiatric radiography as approved by the board or its equivalent, as determined by the board. (6)   Each applicant for a license as an orthopedic x-ray technologist (LRT(O)) shall have satisfactorily completed the basic curriculum for orthopedic radiography as approved by the board or its equivalent, as determined by the board. (7)   Each applicant for a license as an urologic x-ray technologist (LRT(U)) shall have satisfactorily completed the basic curriculum for urologic radiography as approved by the board or its equivalent, as determined by the board. (8)   Each applicant for a license as a radiologist assistant (RA) shall have satisfactorily completed the basic curriculum for a radiologist assistant as approved by the board or its equivalent, as determined by the board. c.     The board shall establish criteria and standards for programs of diagnostic or radiation therapy and approve these programs upon a finding that the standards and criteria have been met. (cf: P.L.2017, c.281, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.